Mississippi, session 2026, SB3109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 55-3-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 55-3-47.  (1)  In order to carry out its management responsibilities over all state park lands which are now or which may hereafter come under its jurisdiction, the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks is hereby authorized to lease, and to grant easements and rights-of-way over and across, any part of such state park lands.  Such leases, easements and rights-of-way may be granted for such consideration, and upon such terms and conditions, as the department may deem to be in the best interest of the state, consistent with the use of said lands for recreational purposes, and subject to the following limitations:  The department shall lease such lands for a term not exceeding twenty-five (25) years and shall grant in the original lease contract a nonnegotiable option to renew such lease for an additional term not to exceed twenty-five (25) years. Both the original lease contract and the option to renew such lease shall be transferable contracts.  Further, the department shall not lease such lands for purposes which are incompatible with recreational use and may place such terms, limitations, restrictions and conditions in such leases as are deemed necessary to ensure the proper utilization of such lands.  Any easement for a utility line shall be granted for that period of time which the department deems to be in the best interest of a state park. (2)  The department is further authorized to enter into such agreements as may be required, upon such terms as may be found to be in the best interest of the state, in settlement of disputes or litigation regarding the title to or boundaries of any state park lands within the jurisdiction of the department, provided such settlement agreements shall be negotiated and drafted with the advice, counsel and assistance of the Attorney General and shall be approved by the Department of Finance and Administration. (3)  In case any of the real estate within any state park under the jurisdiction of the department shall cease to be used or useful for state park purposes, or becomes the subject of boundary or title disputes or litigation, the department may sell and convey the same, with the approval of the Department of Finance and Administration, upon such terms as the Department of Finance and Administration may elect and may, in addition, exchange the same, with the approval of the department, for real estate belonging to any other political subdivision or state, county or local governmental agency or department.  The department is authorized to sell and convey or otherwise transfer any state park or historical site as described in subsection (2) of Section 55-3-33.  Before any such sale or transfer, except as may occur in settlement of title or boundary disputes or litigation, the department shall publish notice of its intention to sell the park land by public sale to the highest and best bidder at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) public newspaper of general circulation in the county where such land is located and also in at least one (1) newspaper of general circulation throughout the state.  Prior to any such sale, the department shall obtain at least two (2) separate and independent appraisals of the land to be sold and may not accept any bid lower than the average of all appraisals made.  The department may reject any and all bids. The owner or any co-owner of record next preceding the state in title to any lands sold hereunder by public bid, excluding any entity which may have exercised the power of eminent domain to assist the state in acquiring said lands, shall have the opportunity to reacquire such lands by matching the successful bid therefor.  If the owner or any co-owner of record next preceding the state in title, or the heirs or estate of such owner or co-owner, acquires said lands, then the department shall not reserve unto the state any minerals owned by the state underlying the conveyed lands.  However, if anyone other than such owner or co-owner, or his heirs or estate, acquires said lands, then the department shall reserve unto the state one-half (1/2) of the minerals owned by the state underlying the conveyed lands, except for lands sold in settlement of title or boundary disputes or litigation, in which case the department may, in its discretion, reserve said minerals.  Appraisal fees shall be shared equally by the department and purchaser. (4)  In exercising the authority granted in this section, the department may act by and through its executive director in the execution of any document or instrument prepared hereunder.  Any lease, deed or settlement agreement executed under the provisions of this section shall bear the seal and attest of the Secretary of State, with whom said instrument or document shall be filed and recorded in addition to any other recording requirements of state law. This section shall not apply to sixteenth section school lands or lieu lands included within any state park, except as may be necessary or appropriate for the department to ratify or confirm any action taken by the agency or department having jurisdiction over such school or lieu lands. All revenues collected by the department by virtue of any transaction consummated under the provisions of this section shall be deposited in the Mississippi Park Fund created by Section 55-3-41, from which funds shall be expended only as authorized by the legislative appropriations process. (5)  This section shall not apply to the donation and conveyance of the Nanih Waiya State Park to the Mississippi Band of Choctaw Indians. (6)  Any leasehold interest or sublease thereof conveyed to any nonprofit organization for the development, support, improvement, administration and/or operation of any state park lands under this section shall be exempt from all state and local ad valorem taxes. SECTION 2.  Section 27-31-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-31-1.  The following shall be exempt from taxation: (a)  All cemeteries used exclusively for burial purposes. (b)  All property, real or personal, belonging to the State of Mississippi or any of its political subdivisions, except property of a municipality not being used for a proper municipal purpose and located outside the county or counties in which such municipality is located.  A proper municipal purpose within the meaning of this section shall be any authorized governmental or corporate function of a municipality. (c)  All property, real or personal, owned by units of the Mississippi National Guard, or title to which is vested in trustees for the benefit of any unit of the Mississippi National Guard; provided such property is used exclusively for such unit, or for public purposes, and not for profit. (d)  All property, real or personal, belonging to any religious society, or ecclesiastical body, or any congregation thereof, or to any charitable society, or to any historical or patriotic association or society, or to any garden or pilgrimage club or association and used exclusively for such society or association and not for profit; not exceeding, however, the amount of land which such association or society may own as provided in Section 79-11-33.  All property, real or personal, belonging to any foundation organized as a nonprofit corporation that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that receives, invests and administers private support for a state-supported institution of higher learning, a public community college or junior college located in the State of Mississippi or a nonprofit private university or college located in the State of Mississippi, as the case may be. For the sole purpose of applying the preceding sentence, all property, real or personal, belonging to an entity that is wholly owned by and controlled by such a foundation shall be treated as belonging to the foundation, provided such property is not leased or otherwise used to generate revenue that is not used exclusively to benefit an institution described above.  All property, real or personal, belonging to any rural waterworks system or rural sewage disposal system incorporated under the provisions of Section 79-11-1.  All property, real or personal, belonging to any college or institution for the education of youths, used directly and exclusively for such purposes, provided that no such college or institution for the education of youths shall have exempt from taxation more than six hundred forty (640) acres of land; provided, however, this exemption shall not apply to commercial schools and colleges or trade institutions or schools where the profits of same inure to individuals, associations or corporations.  All property, real or personal, belonging to an individual, institution or corporation and used for the operation of a grammar school, junior high school, high school or military school.  All property, real or personal, owned and occupied by a fraternal and benevolent organization, when used by such organization, and from which no rentals or other profits accrue to the organization, but any part rented or from which revenue is received shall be taxed. (e)  All property, real or personal, held and occupied by trustees of public schools, and school lands of the respective townships for the use of public schools, and all property kept in storage for the convenience and benefit of the State of Mississippi in warehouses owned or leased by the State of Mississippi, wherein said property is to be sold by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Revenue. (f)  All property, real or personal, whether belonging to religious or charitable or benevolent organizations, which is used for hospital purposes, and nurses' homes where a part thereof, and which maintain one or more charity wards that are for charity patients, and where all the income from said hospitals and nurses' homes is used entirely for the purposes thereof and no part of the same for profit.  All property, real or personal, belonging to a federally qualified health center where all the income from such center is used entirely for the purposes thereof and no part of the same for profit. (g)  The wearing apparel of every person; and also jewelry and watches kept by the owner for personal use to the extent of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) in value for each owner. (h)  Provisions on hand for family consumption. (i)  All farm products grown in this state for a period of two (2) years after they are harvested, when in the possession of or the title to which is in the producer, except the tax of one-fifth of one percent (1/5 of 1%) per pound on lint cotton now levied by the Board of Commissioners of the Mississippi Levee District; and lint cotton for five (5) years, and cottonseed, soybeans, oats, rice and wheat for one (1) year regardless of ownership. (j)  All guns and pistols kept by the owner for private use. (k)  All poultry in the hands of the producer. (l)  Household furniture, including all articles kept in the home by the owner for his own personal or family use; but this shall not apply to hotels, rooming houses or rented or leased apartments. (m)  All cattle and oxen. (n)  All sheep, goats and hogs. (o)  All horses, mules and asses. (p)  Farming tools, implements and machinery, when used exclusively in the cultivation or harvesting of crops or timber. (q)  All property of agricultural and mechanical associations and fairs used for promoting their objects, and where no part of the proceeds is used for profit. (r)  The libraries of all persons. (s)  All pictures and works of art, not kept for or offered for sale as merchandise. (t)  The tools of any mechanic necessary for carrying on his trade. (u)  All state, county, municipal, levee, drainage and all school bonds or other governmental obligations, and all bonds and/or evidences of debts issued by any church or church organization in this state, and all notes and evidences of indebtedness which bear a rate of interest not greater than the maximum rate per annum applicable under the law; and all money loaned at a rate of interest not exceeding the maximum rate per annum applicable under the law; and all stock in or bonds of foreign corporations or associations shall be exempt from all ad valorem taxes. (v)  All lands and other property situated or located between the Mississippi River and the levee shall be exempt from the payment of any and all road taxes levied or assessed under any road laws of this state. (w)  Any and all money on deposit in either national banks, state banks or trust companies, on open account, savings account or time deposit. (x)  All wagons, carts, drays, carriages and other horse-drawn vehicles, kept for the use of the owner. (y)  (i)  Boats, seines and fishing equipment used in fishing and shrimping operations and in the taking or catching of oysters. (ii)  All towboats, tugboats and barges documented under the laws of the United States, except watercraft of every kind and character used in connection with gaming operations. (z)  (i)  All materials used in the construction and/or conversion of vessels in this state; (ii)  Vessels while under construction and/or conversion; (iii)  Vessels while in the possession of the manufacturer, builder or converter, for a period of twelve (12) months after completion of construction and/or conversion; however, the twelve-month limitation shall not apply to: 1.  Vessels used for the exploration for, or production of, oil, gas and other minerals offshore outside the boundaries of this state; or 2.  Vessels that were used for the exploration for, or production of, oil, gas and other minerals that are converted to a new service for use outside the boundaries of this state; (iv)  1.  In order for a vessel described in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (z) to be exempt for a period of more than twelve (12) months, the vessel must: a.  Be operating or operable, generating or capable of generating its own power or connected to some other power source, and not removed from the service or use for which manufactured or to which converted; and b.  The manufacturer, builder, converter or other entity possessing the vessel must be in compliance with any lease or other agreement with any applicable port authority or other entity regarding the vessel and in compliance with all applicable tax laws of this state and applicable federal tax laws. 2.  A vessel exempt from taxation under subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (z) may not be exempt for a period of more than three (3) years unless the board of supervisors of the county and/or governing authorities of the municipality, as the case may be, in which the vessel would otherwise be taxable adopts a resolution or ordinance authorizing the extension of the exemption and setting a maximum period for the exemption. (v)  As used in this paragraph (z), the term "vessel" includes ships, offshore drilling equipment, dry docks, boats and barges, except watercraft of every kind and character used in connection with gaming operations. (aa)  Sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of nuclear fuel and reprocessed, recycled or residual nuclear fuel by-products, fissionable or otherwise, used or to be used in generation of electricity by persons defined as public utilities in Section 77-3-3. (bb)  All growing nursery stock. (cc)  A semitrailer used in interstate commerce. (dd)  All property, real or personal, used exclusively for the housing of and provision of services to elderly persons, disabled persons, mentally impaired persons or as a nursing home, which is owned, operated and managed by a not-for-profit corporation, qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, whose membership or governing body is appointed or confirmed by a religious society or ecclesiastical body or any congregation thereof. (ee)  All vessels while in the hands of bona fide dealers as merchandise and which are not being operated upon the waters of this state shall be exempt from ad valorem taxes. As used in this paragraph, the terms "vessel" and "waters of this state" shall have the meaning ascribed to such terms in Section 59-21-3. (ff)  All property, real or personal, owned by a nonprofit organization that:  (i) is qualified as tax exempt under Section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; (ii) assists in the implementation of the national contingency plan or area contingency plan, and which is created in response to the requirements of Title IV, Subtitle B of the Oil Pollution Act of 1990, Public Law 101-380; (iii) engages primarily in programs to contain, clean up and otherwise mitigate spills of oil or other substances occurring in the United States coastal or tidal waters; and (iv) is used for the purposes of the organization. (gg)  If a municipality changes its boundaries so as to include within the boundaries of such municipality the project site of any project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1, Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix), all real and personal property located on the project site within the boundaries of such municipality that is owned by a business enterprise operating such project, shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation for a period of time not to exceed thirty (30) years upon receiving approval for such exemption by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority.  The provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to authorize a breach of any agreement entered into pursuant to Section 21-1-59. (hh)  All leases, lease contracts or lease agreements (including, but not limited to, subleases, sublease contracts and sublease agreements), and leaseholds or leasehold interests (including, but not limited to, subleaseholds and subleasehold interests), of or with respect to any and all property (real, personal or mixed) constituting all or any part of a facility for the manufacture, production, generation, transmission and/or distribution of electricity, and any real property related thereto, shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation during the period as the United States is both the title owner of the property and a sublessee of or with respect to the property; however, the exemption authorized by this paragraph (hh) shall not apply to any entity to whom the United States sub-subleases its interest in the property nor to any entity to whom the United States assigns its sublease interest in the property.  As used in this paragraph, the term "United States" includes an agency or instrumentality of the United States of America.  This paragraph (hh) shall apply to all assessments for ad valorem taxation for the 2003 calendar year and each calendar year thereafter. (ii)  All property, real, personal or mixed, including fixtures and leaseholds, used by Mississippi nonprofit entities qualified, on or before January 1, 2005, under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to provide support and operate technology incubators for research and development start-up companies, telecommunication startup companies and/or other technology startup companies, utilizing technology spun-off from research and development activities of the public colleges and universities of this state, State of Mississippi governmental research or development activities resulting therefrom located within the State of Mississippi. (jj)  All property, real, personal or mixed, including fixtures and leaseholds, of start-up companies (as described in paragraph (ii) of this section) for the period of time, not to exceed five (5) years, that the startup company remains a tenant of a technology incubator (as described in paragraph (ii) of this section). (kk)  All leases, lease contracts or lease agreements (including, but not limited to, subleases, sublease contracts and sublease agreements), and leaseholds or leasehold interests, of or with respect to any and all property (real, personal or mixed) constituting all or any part of an auxiliary facility, and any real property related thereto, constructed or renovated pursuant to Section 37-101-41. (ll)  Equipment brought into the state temporarily for use during a disaster response period as provided in Sections 27-113-1 through 27-113-9 and subsequently removed from the state on or before the end of the disaster response period as defined in Section 27-113-5. (mm)  For any lease or contractual arrangement to which the Department of Finance and Administration and a nonprofit corporation are a party to as provided in Section 39-25-1(5), the nonprofit corporation shall, along with the possessory and leasehold interests and/or real and personal property of the corporation, be exempt from all ad valorem taxation, including, but not limited to, school, city and county ad valorem taxes, for the term or period of time stated in the lease or contractual arrangement. (nn) All property, real or personal, that is owned, operated and managed by a not for profit corporation qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and used to provide, free of charge, (i) a practice facility for a public school district swim team, and (ii) a facility for another not for profit organization as defined under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to conduct water safety and lifeguard training programs.  This section shall not apply to real or personal property owned by a country club, tennis club with a pool, or any club requiring stock ownership for membership. (oo)  Any all-terrain vehicle, as defined in Section 63-21-5, when held by a retailer on a consignment or floor plan basis. (pp)  Any leasehold interest or sublease thereof conveyed to any nonprofit organization for the development, support, improvement, administration and/or operation of any state park lands under Section 55-3-47. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2026.